Hawaii statutes.
§346-152.5 Requirements for persons exempt
pursuant to section 346-152. (a) To be eligible to provide child care for
a child whose family receives a child care subsidy from the department, persons
exempt pursuant to section 346-152 shall be required to agree to:

(1) A criminal history record check, a sex offender
registry check, a child abuse record check, and an adult abuse perpetrator check
in the same manner as a prospective applicant or licensed provider in accordance
with section 346-154; provided that the criminal history record check shall be
limited to a criminal history record check conducted through files maintained
by the Hawaii criminal justice data center for the following relatives of the child
who requires care: grandparents, great-grandparents, aunts, uncles, and siblings
aged eighteen or older living in a separate residence;

(2) Completion of a pre-service or orientation
training and ongoing training in health and safety topics; and

(3) Any monitoring inspection visits by the department
or its designee to determine compliance with minimum health and safety
standards at the location where child care is being provided for a child whose
family receives a child care subsidy from the department, including
investigations by the department when the department has received a report of
health and safety concerns.

(b) For the purposes of this section,
"adult abuse perpetrator check" means a search to determine whether an
individual is known to the department as a perpetrator of abuse as defined in section
346-222, by means of a search of the individual's name and birth date in the department's
adult protective services file. [L 2001, c 201, §1; am L 2012, c 41, §1; am L
2016, c 88, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next